Mississippi statutes. Title 59. Ports, Harbors, Landings and Watercraft
Article 7. Cumulative Provisions.

§ 59-7-301.
Construction and effect of article.

This article, as to the subject matters hereof, shall supersede all other laws, general, special or local, including charters of municipalities. Any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this article shall have no power thereafter to issue bonds or other obligations pursuant to the provisions of Article 1 of this chapter, unless and until all bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article, and interest thereon, have been fully paid and discharged.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7589; Laws, 1934, ch. 209.

§ 59-7-303.
Levy of ad valorem tax in certain counties; disposition of proceeds of tax.

An ad valorem tax of two mills on each one dollar of the total assessed valuation of all the taxable property in each county or counties in the State of Mississippi, in which there is located a harbor or port of entry where commodities are exported to foreign nations, and where there is maintained a channel and/or harbor or port to a depth of not less than twenty feet, be, and the same is hereby, levied on all said taxable property, in or for each year in which the principal of or interest on any bonds or other obligations issued by any municipality pursuant to this article becomes due. The receipts from said two-mill tax shall be withheld by the tax collector of said county, and/or by any other tax collecting agency authorized by law for the collection of said taxes, from receipts from state ad valorem taxes now in effect or which may be hereafter levied, so long as the state ad valorem taxes shall be not less than the two-mill tax herein levied. However, if no state ad valorem taxes equal to or greater than the said two-mill tax herein levied is now or shall be hereafter levied, then and in that event, the said two-mill tax herein levied shall continue to be levied and collected as herein provided in each such county or counties in or for each year in which the principal of or interest on any bonds or other obligations issued by any municipality pursuant to this article becomes due. The tax collector, and/or any other tax collecting agency authorized by law for the collection of said taxes, shall pay over all moneys collected or to be collected as receipts from said two-mill tax to any trustee or successor thereto established as hereinafter in this article provided, and in the event that there is no such trustee, then said tax collector, and/or any other tax collecting agency authorized by law for collection of said taxes, shall pay over all such moneys into the county depository of each such county to the credit of a fund which shall be known as a port fund. Any such moneys so paid into the county depository of each such county to the credit of said port fund may be expended at the direction of the port commission, appointed for any port of entry as designated in chapter 1 of this title. But in no county within the terms of this article shall there be withheld from the state treasury under the provisions of this article and Article 1 of this chapter, for any one year an amount in excess of the receipts from said two-mill tax. The provisions of this article shall be deemed to be a contract with the holders of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7577; Laws, 1934, ch. 209.

§ 59-7-305.
Powers of municipal authorities as to promotion, development, etc., of harbors or seaports.

The authorities of any municipality in which there is situated and located, in whole or in part, a port of entry through which commodities are imported and exported to foreign nations, which maintains a channel and/or harbor to a depth of not less than twenty feet, are hereby given the authority to engage in, either directly or through the commission hereinafter provided and designated and such other agencies as hereafter may be provided by law, work of internal improvement, or promoting, developing, constructing, maintaining, and operating harbors or seaports within the state and its jurisdiction, and either directly or through the commission hereinafter provided for, shall have the power to acquire, purchase, install, rent, lease, mortgage, and/or otherwise encumber, to construct, own, hold, maintain, equip, use, control and operate at seaports, wharves, piers, docks, quays, grain elevators, cotton compresses, warehouses, floating dry docks, graving docks, marine railways, tugboats, cold storage facilities and other water and rail terminals and other structures, and facilities needful for the convenient use of the same in the aid of commerce including the dredging of approaches thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7578; Laws, 1934, ch. 209; Laws, 1960, ch. 435.

§ 59-7-307.
Maintenance and operation of improvements and facilities by port commission; collection, etc., of rents, fees, etc.; disposition of revenues; annual reports.

All improvements and facilities constructed pursuant to Article 1 of this chapter, and/or constructed pursuant to this article, shall be maintained and operated under the control of the port commission as provided in chapter 1 of this title. The said port commission shall, subject to and in accordance with any agreement or agreements as may be made by any such municipality with the purchaser or purchasers of bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article, prescribe, levy and collect all rents, fees, tolls, revenues, and/or other charges in connection with the use and occupancy of the aforesaid improvements and facilities, and shall pay over all net revenues derived from the operation of said improvements and facilities to any trustee, or successor thereto, established as hereinafter in this article provided. Net revenues shall be deemed to be such as may be defined in any agreement or agreements entered into between any such municipality and the purchaser or purchasers of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article. The said port commission shall make an annual report to the governor of the State of Mississippi, to the municipality having such port of entry, and to the state legislature.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7579; Laws, 1934, ch. 209; Laws, 1970, ch. 409, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1970.

§ 59-7-309.
Authorization of issuance of bonds by municipalities; audit and inspection of accounts.

Any municipality, in which there is situated and located in whole or in part a port of entry through which commodities are imported or exported as aforesaid, is hereby given authority, upon the adoption of a resolution to such effect, to issue bonds or other obligations for any or all of the purposes as provided in this article. The books of account and other sources of information pertaining to duties under the provisions of this article, of any port commission, municipality and/or county affected by this article, shall be and remain at all times open to inspection and subject to audit by the holder or holders of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7581; Laws, 1934, ch. 209.

§ 59-7-311.
Exercise of authority for issuance of bonds; form, terms and conditions of bonds; execution of bonds; negotiability and sale of bonds; disposition of proceeds of sale; payment of principal and interests on bonds.

The power to issue bonds or other obligations authorized by this article and Section 59-5-31, shall be vested in and may be exercised from time to time by the governing bodies of any municipality or county so authorized in such laws.

Such revenue bonds may be issued without an election upon the adoption of a resolution of the board of supervisors of such county, declaring its intention to issue such bonds, and shall not be subject to any limitation as to amount, and shall not be included or computed in the statutory limitation of indebtedness of any such county. Such bonds shall bear date or dates, be in such denomination or denominations, bear interest at such rate or rates, be payable at such place or places within or without the State of Mississippi, shall mature at such time or times and upon such terms, with or without premium, shall bear such registration privileges, and shall be substantially in such form, all as shall be determined by resolution of the board of supervisors of such county. Such bonds shall mature in annual installments beginning not more than five years from date thereof and extending not more than thirty-five years from date thereof. Such bonds shall be signed by the president of the board of supervisors of such county, and the official seal of the county shall be affixed thereto, attested by the clerk of the board of supervisors of such county. The interest coupons to be attached to such bonds may be executed by the facsimile signatures of said officers. Whenever any such bonds shall have been signed by the officials herein designated to sign the bonds who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers prior to the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the signatures of such officers upon such bonds and coupons shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially signing such bonds had remained in office until the delivery of the same to the purchaser or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear.

All bonds and interest coupons issued under the provisions of this article shall have and are hereby declared to have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the Mississippi Uniform Commercial Code. Such bonds and income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation within the State of Mississippi.

The board of supervisors of such county shall sell such bonds in such manner and for such price as it may determine to be for the best interest of said county, but no such sale shall be made at a price less than par plus accrued interest to date of delivery of the bonds to the purchaser. Notice of the sale of any such bonds shall be published at least one time not less than ten days prior to the date of sale and shall be published in a newspaper published in and having general circulation within the county.

The proceeds of such bonds shall be paid into a special fund or funds in banks qualified to act as depositories for such county. The proceeds of such bonds shall be solely for the purposes for which they were issued, and the redeeming of any outstanding bonds, and shall be disbursed upon the order of the board of supervisors of such county, with such restrictions, if any, as the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds may provide. If the proceeds of such bonds, by error of calculation or otherwise, shall be less than the cost of the purpose for which they were issued, and the redeeming of any outstanding bonds, unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, additional bonds may in like manner be issued to provide the amount of such deficit which, unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds, shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without preference or priority of the bonds first issued for the same purpose. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue shall exceed the amount required for the purpose for which the bonds were issued, the surplus shall be paid into the fund established for the payment of the principal of and the interest on such bonds.

Such bonds may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions, and things which are specified or required by this article. The bonds authorized under the authority of this article may, in the discretion of the board of supervisors of such county, be validated in the chancery court of such county in the manner and with the force and effect provided by Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the validation of county, municipal, school district, and other bonds.

The revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this section shall be payable solely out of the revenues to accrue from the operation of such project, development, improvement or utility systems, and the full faith and credit of the county shall not be pledged therefor, nor shall any ad valorem tax be levied therefor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7585; Laws, 1934, ch. 209; Laws, 1938, Ex. ch. 49; Laws, 1960, ch. 436; Laws, 1962, ch. 395, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 26, 1962).

§ 59-7-313.
Disposition of proceeds of bonds; penalties for diversion; guarantee of payment.

The proceeds from the sale of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article shall be placed to the credit of such municipality in a bank or banks which are members of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and may be withdrawn therefrom in accordance with any agreement or agreements entered into between such municipality and the purchaser or purchasers of such bonds or other obligations and in accordance with the laws regulating the disbursement of municipal funds and shall be used for no other purpose than the purpose or purposes set forth in the original resolution of the governing body of such municipality. Any officer or other person diverting or assisting to divert any such funds to any other purpose or purposes than the purpose or purposes originally set forth in said resolution of the governing body of said municipality shall be guilty of a felony and punishable accordingly, and shall be liable both personally and on official bonds for such diversion. Nothing in this article shall be construed as a guarantee on the part of the State of Mississippi to pay the principal of or interest on any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7586; Laws, 1934, ch. 209; Laws, 1938, ch. 137.

§ 59-7-315.
Mortgage or deed of trust securing bonds.

Any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this article by resolution or resolutions duly adopted, is hereby given authority to execute and deliver a mortgage or deed of trust, in such form, with such validity and with such remedies as at present authorized under the laws of the State of Mississippi, on any or all properties, improvements and facilities, the acquisition, construction, maintenance and/or operation of which are provided for by this article. Such resolution or resolutions of said municipality shall prescribe the provisions, covenants and conditions of any such mortgage or deed of trust. Such provisions, covenants and conditions, if not self-executing, may be enforced by appropriate proceedings, either in law or in equity.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7587; Laws, 1934, ch. 209.

§ 59-7-317.
Applicability of municipal debt limitations to bond issues; funds from which bonds payable.

The bonds or other obligations issued by any municipality of the State of Mississippi pursuant to this article shall not constitute a debt within the meaning of any statutory limitation as to the amount of debt which may be incurred by any such municipality, nor shall such bonds or other obligations be payable out of any funds other than the revenue collected or collectible from the use of said docks, harbors and facilities of whatsoever nature, and out of the receipts from the said two-mill ad valorem tax, in accordance with the provisions of Section 59-7-303.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7580; Laws, 1934, ch. 209.

§ 59-7-319.
Exemption from taxation of bonds.

Bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article and any interest thereon or income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation, except gift, transfer and inheritance taxes, in so far as may be within the power of the State of Mississippi so to provide.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7584; Laws, 1934, ch. 209.

§ 59-7-321.
Powers of municipality with respect to issuance of bonds.

In connection with the issuance of bonds or other obligations by any municipality pursuant to this article, or in order to secure the payment of said bonds or other obligations, such municipality shall have power:

To accept grants from the United States of America, the president of the United States, the federal emergency administrator of public works, or such other agencies, instrumentalities or corporations as may be designated or created to make grants or loans (hereinafter termed “federal agency”) pursuant to the national industrial recovery act and any further act of the congress of the United States providing for the construction of useful public works (hereinafter termed “national industrial recovery act”), for or in aid of work, development or improvement authorized by this article.

To make such contracts and execute such instruments containing such provisions, covenants and conditions as in the discretion of the authorities of any such municipalities may be necessary, proper or advisable for the purpose of obtaining or securing grants, loans, or other financial assistance from any federal agency pursuant to the national industrial recovery act; to make such further, different or additional contracts and execute all instruments necessary or convenient in or for the furtherance of any work, development or improvement, including but not limited to all property real and personal appurtenant thereto or connected therewith and the existing work, development or improvement, if any, to which the work, development or improvement authorized by this article is an extension, addition, betterment or embellishment (hereinafter termed “work, development or improvement”), to carry out and perform the terms and conditions of any such contract or instrument.

To pledge all or any part of the fees, rents, tolls, revenues or other charges received or receivable by such municipality and/or port commission from any work, development or improvement to which its right then exists or the right to which may thereafter come into existence.

To covenant against the pledging of all or any part of the fees, rents, tolls, revenues or other charges received or receivable by such municipality and/or port commission from any work, development or improvement to which its right then exists or the right to which may thereafter come into existence.

To covenant against the encumbering of all or any part of any work, development or improvement or against permitting or suffering any lien thereon.

To covenant as to what other or additional debt may be incurred by such municipality.

To provide for the preparation, specifications, terms, form, registration, extension, execution and authentication of any bonds or other obligations, issued pursuant to this article.

To provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed or mutilated bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article.

To covenant as to the fees, rents, revenues or tolls to be charged, the amount to be raised each year or other period of time and as to the use and disbursement to be made thereof.

To covenant to set aside or to pay over reserves and sinking funds and as to the disposal thereof.

To redeem prior to maturity, with or without premium, bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article and to covenant for their prior redemption and to provide the terms and conditions thereof.

To covenant against extending the time for the payment of the interest on or principal of the bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article directly or indirectly by any means or in any manner.

To covenant as to books of account of such municipality and as to the inspection and audit thereof and as to the accounting methods.

To covenant as to the rights, liabilities, powers and duties arising upon the breach by such municipality of any covenant, condition or obligation assumed pursuant to this article.

To make such covenants and do any and all such acts and things as may be necessary, convenient or desirable in order to secure any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article, or in the absolute discretion of the authorities of such municipality in order to make such bonds or other obligations more marketable, notwithstanding that such covenants, acts, or things may not be enumerated herein or expressly authorized herein; it being the intention hereby to give the authorities of any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this article the power to do all things in the issuance of said bonds or other obligations and for their execution that may not be inconsistent with the constitution of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7582; Laws, 1934, ch. 209.

§ 59-7-323.
Trustees.

Any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this article shall, so long as any such bonds or other obligations remain outstanding and unpaid, by resolution or resolutions duly adopted, authorize and appoint a trustee, satisfactory to the purchaser or purchasers of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article or any successor thereto, with the following powers and duties:

Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall receive and receipt for all monies collected or to be collected as receipts from the aforesaid two-mill tax by the aforesaid tax collector, and/or any other tax collecting agency authorized by law for the collection of said taxes, as provided for in Section 59-7-303;

Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall receive and receipt for all monies paid or to be paid to it in accordance with Section 59-7-307, constituting the net revenues derived from the operation of the improvements and facilities authorized by this article;

Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall deposit all monies received or to be received, in a special account or accounts in a bank or banks which are members of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, with such provisions for security therefor as may be incorporated in any agreement or agreements entered into between any such municipality and the purchaser or purchasers of any such bonds or other obligations;

Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall use and apply all such monies so received to the payment of principal of and interest on any bonds or other obligations issued by any municipality pursuant to this article, as the same become due, and shall use and apply any surplus remaining after such payment or payments for the prior redemption, with or without premium, of bonds or other obligations issued by any municipality pursuant to this article, or in accordance with the provisions of any agreement or agreements as may be made between any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this article and the purchaser or purchasers of such bonds or other obligations;

Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall have and be vested with all rights, powers and duties, in addition to the foregoing, as may be provided for in any agreement or agreements between any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this article and the purchaser or purchasers of such bonds, or other obligations;

Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall by an instrument in writing, accept such trust and shall file such written acceptance of such trust with the clerk of the municipality so appointing such trustee;

If such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall fail, neglect or refuse to perform any of the duties herein imposed or that may be imposed by reason of any of the provisions of any agreement or agreements as aforesaid, such trustee, or any successor thereto, shall, on the written request of twenty per centum or more in aggregate principal amount of the holder or holders of bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article, be removed, by resolution duly adopted by the municipality by which such trustee, or any successor thereto, was appointed; and in such event, it shall be the duty of any such trustee so removed to effectuate a valid transfer of all monies then in the possession or under the control of such trustee so removed to a duly appointed successor, and a failure on the part of such trustee so removed to do so shall constitute an embezzlement of such monies and shall be punishable accordingly;

In the event any such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall be removed as hereinabove provided, it shall be the duty of any municipality, which shall have removed any such trustee, immediately by resolution duly adopted to appoint a trustee, as successor thereto, who is satisfactory to said holder or holders of twenty per centum or more in aggregate principal amount of bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7583; Laws, 1934, ch. 209; Laws, 1950, ch. 202.